Utah statutes.
58-3a-603.    Seal -- Authorized use.
(1)  An architect may only affix the architect's seal to a plan and a
specification when the plan and the specification:
(a)  was personally prepared by the architect;
(b)  was prepared by an employee, subordinate, associate, or drafter under the
supervision of a licensee, provided the licensee or a principal affixing his
seal assumes responsibility;
(c)  was prepared by a licensed architect, professional engineer, or
professional structural engineer in this state or any other state provided:
(i)  the licensee in this state affixing the seal performs a thorough review
of all work for compliance with all applicable laws and rules and the
standards of the profession; and
(ii)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final plan and
specification:
(A)  to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit; or
(B)  to a client who has contracted with an architect for the design of a
building, when the architect represents, or could reasonably expect the client
to consider, the plans and a specification to be complete and final;
(d)  was prepared in part by a licensed architect, professional engineer, or
professional structural engineer in this state or any other state provided:
(i)  the licensee in this state clearly identifies that portion of the plans
and specification for which the licensee is responsible;
(ii)  the licensee in this state affixing the seal performs a thorough review
of that portion of the plan and specification for which the licensee is
responsible for compliance with the standards of the profession; and
(iii)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final plan and
specification for which the licensee is responsible:
(A)  to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit; or
(B)  to a client who has contracted with an architect for the design of a
building, when the architect represents, or could reasonably expect the client
to consider, the plans and specifications to be complete and final;
(e)  was prepared by a person exempt from licensure as an architect,
professional engineer, or professional structural engineer provided that:
(i)  the licensee in this state affixing the seal performs a thorough review
for compliance with all applicable laws and rules and the standards of the
profession; and
(ii)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final plan and
specification:
(A)  to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit; or
(B)  to a client who has contracted with an architect for the design of a
building, when the architect represents, or could reasonably expect the client
to consider, the plan and specification to be complete and final; or
(f)  meet any additional requirements established by rule by the division in
collaboration with the board.
